Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-2477
Act; how construed; practitioner; duties; compound or reconstitute drug; duties.

(1) Nothing in the Prescription Drug Safety Act shall be construed as authority for a practitioner to perform any activity he or she is not otherwise authorized to perform by another law of this state.

(2) A practitioner that stores, dispenses, compounds, administers, or otherwise provides any drug to a patient shall comply with the Prescription Drug Safety Act.

(3) A practitioner or authorized person that compounds or reconstitutes any drug shall comply with section 38-2867.01.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 21.